District of Columbia statutes.
31-5324

Annual license.

Societies which are now authorized to transact business in the District, and all societies hereafter licensed, may continue such business until March 1 next succeeding April 29, 1998. The authority of the societies and all societies hereafter licensed, may thereafter be renewed annually, but in all cases to terminate on the succeeding March 1. However, a license so issued shall continue in full force and effect until a renewal of the license has been specifically refused. For each such license or renewal the society shall pay the Commissioner a fee of $50. A duly certified copy or duplicate of the license shall be prima facie evidence that the licensee is a fraternal benefit society within the meaning of this chapter.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1225, 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1254.